Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 2 Rights of Minor and Obligations of Conservator

29-3-20.
Rights of minor; effect on testamentary capacity.

In every conservatorship, the minor has the right to:

A qualified conservator who acts in the best interest of the minor;

A conservator who is reasonably accessible to the minor;

Have the minor’s property utilized as necessary to provide adequately for the minor’s support, care, education, health, and welfare; and

Individually or through the minor’s representative or legal counsel, bring an action relating to the conservatorship.

The appointment of a conservator is not a determination that an individual who is 14 years of age or older lacks testamentary capacity.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-21.
Obligations of conservator; liability of conservator.

A conservator shall receive, collect, and make decisions regarding the minor’s property, except as otherwise provided by law or by the court. A conservator shall at all times act as a fiduciary in the minor’s best interest and exercise reasonable care, diligence, and prudence.

A conservator shall:

Respect the rights and dignity of the minor;

Be reasonably accessible to the minor and maintain regular communication with the minor;

Petition to have a guardian appointed if necessary;

Endeavor to cooperate with the guardian, if any;

Provide for the support, care, education, health, and welfare of the minor, considering available resources;

Give such bond as required by Code Section 29-3-40;

Within two months of appointment, file with the court and provide to the guardian, if any, an inventory of the minor’s property and a plan for administering the property, pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 29-3-30;

Take into account any estate plan of the minor known to the conservator in the administration of the conservatorship;

Keep accurate records including adequate supporting data and file annual returns as required by Code Section 29-3-60;

Promptly notify the court of any conflict of interest between the minor and the conservator when the conflict arises or becomes known to the conservator and take such action as is required by Code Section 29-3-23;

Keep the court informed of the conservator’s current address; and

Act promptly to terminate the conservatorship when the minor reaches the age of majority.

A conservator, solely by reason of the conservator-minor relationship, is not personally liable for:

The minor’s expenses;

Contracts entered into in the conservator’s fiduciary capacity;

The acts or omissions of the minor;

Obligations arising from ownership or control of property of the minor; or

Other acts or omissions occurring in the course of the conservatorship.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Cross references.

Service of process on guardian of incapacitated adult, § 9-11-4(l)(4).

Administrator’s duty to file inventory, § 53-7-75 (Pre-1998 Probate Code).

Law reviews.

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (2008).

29-3-22.
Power of conservator; cooperation with guardian of minor.

Without court order, the appointment of a conservator shall vest in the conservator the exclusive power to:

Make reasonable disbursements from the annual income or, if applicable, from the annual budget amount that has been approved by the court pursuant to Code Section 29-3-30 for the support, care, education, health, and welfare of the minor;

Enter into contracts for labor or services upon such terms as the conservator may deem best, but only to the extent that the annual compensation payable under such contracts when combined with other anticipated disbursements does not exceed the amount of the annual income or, if applicable, the annual budget amount which has been approved by the court pursuant to Code Section 29-3-30;

Borrow money for one year or less and bind the minor or the minor’s property, but only if the amount of the annual payments when combined with other anticipated disbursements does not exceed the amount of the annual income or, if applicable, the annual budget amount that has been approved by the court pursuant to Code Section 29-3-30 and only if done for purposes of paying the minor’s debts, providing for the support, care, education, health, or welfare of the minor, or repairing the minor’s dwelling place;

Receive, collect, and hold the minor’s property, additions to the minor’s property, and all related records, subject to subsection (d) of Code Section 29-3-41;

Retain the property received by the conservator upon the creation of the conservatorship in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 29-3-31;

Bring, defend, or participate in legal, equitable, or administrative proceedings, including alternative dispute resolution, as are appropriate for the support, care, education, health, or welfare of the minor in the name of or on behalf of the minor;

Fulfill, as far as possible, or, to the extent permitted by law, disaffirm the executory contracts and comply with the executed contracts of the minor;

Examine the will and any other estate planning documents of the minor;

Appoint an attorney in fact to act for the conservator when the conservator is unable to act; provided, however, that the conservator and the conservator’s sureties shall be bound for the acts of the attorney as if the acts were the personal acts of the conservator;

Invest the minor’s property pursuant to the provisions of Code Sections 29-3-32 and 29-3-33;

Sell the minor’s stocks and bonds pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-3-35;

Compromise any contested or doubtful claim for or against the minor if the proposed gross settlement as defined in Code Section 29-3-3 is in an amount not greater than $25,000.00; and

Release the debtor and compromise all debts in an amount not greater than $25,000.00 when the collection of the debt is doubtful.

In the petition for appointment, or at any time during the conservatorship, the conservator may request the continuing power to:

Invest the minor’s property in investments other than those authorized in Code Section 29-3-32, pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 29-3-34, without further court approval of any investment;

Sell, rent, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of any or all of the minor’s real or personal property without complying with the provisions of Code Section 29-3-35, other than the provisions for additional bond set forth in subsection (e) of Code Section 29-3-35;

Continue the operation of any farm or business in which the minor has an interest; or

Access the digital assets of the minor, pursuant to Code Section 53-13-20.

Unless the request for the powers described in paragraph (1) of this subsection is made in the petition for the initial appointment of the conservator, the court shall order such hearing as the court deems appropriate. Notice shall be given by personal service to the minor and a guardian ad litem appointed for the minor. Notice shall be given by first-class mail to the guardian of the minor, if any; the surety on the conservator’s bond; and to the following relatives of the minor whose whereabouts are known:

Any parent of the minor whose parental rights have not been terminated;

If there is no parent of the minor whose parental rights have not been terminated, the adult siblings of the minor; provided, however, that not more than three adult siblings need to be notified;

If there is no adult sibling of the minor, the grandparents of the minor; provided, however, that not more than three grandparents need to be notified; or

If there is no grandparent of the minor, any three of the nearest adult relatives of the minor determined as set forth in Code Section 53-2-1.

After appointment of a guardian ad litem for the minor and such hearing as the court deems appropriate, in granting the petition for appointment of conservator or at any time during the conservatorship, the court may grant the conservator any of the following powers on a case-by-case basis:

To make disbursements that exceed by no more than a specific amount the annual income or, if applicable, the annual budget amount which has been approved by the court pursuant to Code Section 29-3-30 for the support, care, education, health, and welfare of the minor;

To enter into contracts for labor or services for which the compensation payable under the contracts when combined with other disbursements from the estate exceeds the annual income or, if applicable, the annual budget amount which has been approved by the court pursuant to Code Section 29-3-30;

To make specific investments of the minor’s property that do not comply with the provisions of Code Section 29-3-32, pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 29-3-34;

To sell, rent, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of specific items of the minor’s real or personal property without complying with the provisions of Code Section 29-3-35 other than the provisions for additional bond set forth in subsection (e) of Code Section 29-3-35;

Pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 29-3-3, to compromise a contested or doubtful claim for or against the minor if the proposed gross settlement as defined in Code Section 29-3-3 is in an amount greater than $25,000.00;

To release the debtor and compromise a debt that is in an amount greater than $25,000.00 when the collection of the debt is doubtful;

To establish or add property to a trust for the benefit of the minor; provided, however, that the trust must provide that the minor may revoke the trust at any time after reaching the age of majority and, unless otherwise provided by court order pursuant to Code Section 29-3-36, the trust shall terminate upon the minor’s death and any property remaining in the trust shall be paid to the minor’s estate;

To disclaim or renounce any property or interest in property of the minor in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 53-1-20;

To access the digital assets of the minor pursuant to Code Section 53-13-20;

To engage in estate planning for the minor pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 29-3-36; and

To perform such other acts as may be in the best interest of the minor.

In granting any of the powers described in subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section, the court shall consider the views of the guardian, if available, or, if there is no guardian, of others who have custody of the minor.

In performing any of the acts described in this Code section, the conservator shall endeavor to cooperate with the guardian or, if there is no guardian, with others who have custody of the minor.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 805, § 7/SB 534; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 29/HB 142; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1089, § 5/SB 301; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 3/HB 70; Ga. L. 2022, p. 207, § 4/HB 620.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in paragraph (b)(1), deleted “or” at the end of subparagraph (b)(1)(B), added “; or” at the end of subparagraph (b)(1)(C), and added subparagraph (b)(1)(D).

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, added paragraph (c)(9) and redesignated former paragraphs (c)(9) and (c)(10) as present paragraphs (c)(10) and (c)(11), respectively.

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, added “, subject to subsection (d) of Code Section 29-3-41” at the end of paragraph (a)(4), substituted “in an amount not greater than $25,000.00” for “in the amount of $15,000.00 or less” in paragraphs (a)(12) and (a)(13); substituted “in an amount greater than $25,000.00” for “more than the amount of $15,000.00” in paragraph (c)(5), and substituted “that is in an amount greater than $25,000.00” for “which is in the amount of more than $15,000.00” in paragraph (c)(6).

Cross references.

Service of process on guardian of incapacitated adult, § 9-11-4(l)(4).

Bond required of guardians of minors, §

29-4-12

.

Contracts for labor or service by trustees and administrators, § 53-7-8 (Pre-1998 Probate Code).

Private sale of certain stocks and bonds by guardian, § 53-8-37 (Pre-1998 Probate Code).

Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act, § 53-13-1 et seq.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, “ Code Section 29-3-35” was substituted for “ Code Section 2-3-35” in subparagraph (b)(1)(B) and paragraph (c)(4); and “or” was added following the semicolon at the end of subparagraph (b)(2)(C).

Law reviews.

For note discussing and comparing the prudent man rule and the legal list rule in trustee investment, see 15 Mercer L. Rev. 530 (1964).

For article discussing the custodian as a fiduciary under the Gifts to Minors Act (O.C.G.A. Title 44, Chapter 5, Article 5), see 7 Ga. St. B.J. 175 (1970).

For article, “The Child as a Party in Interest in Custody Proceedings,” see 10 Ga. St. B.J. 577 (1974).

For article, “The Scope of Permissible Investments by Fiduciaries Under Georgia Law,” see 19 Ga. St. B.J. 6 (1982).

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (1986).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 42 Mercer L. Rev. 491 (1990).

For article, “Wills, Trusts & Administration of Estates,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 499 (2001).

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 204 (2018).

29-3-23.
Rights of conservator to property; disclosure of conflicts of interest.

The appointment of a conservator shall not automatically cause the conservator to forfeit any rights to property.

The conservator must promptly disclose any conflict of interest between the conservator and the minor when it arises or becomes known to the conservator and seek the court’s determination as to whether the conflict is insubstantial or whether it is in the best interest of the minor for the conservator to continue to serve and not forfeit any property right. If the court finds that the conflict of interest is substantial or contrary to the best interest of the minor, the conservator may either resign or forfeit the property interest that is the source of the conflict.

A transaction affected by a substantial conflict between personal and fiduciary interests includes any sale, encumbrance, or other transaction involving the conservatorship estate entered into by the conservator or the spouse, descendant, agent, or lawyer of the conservator or a corporation or other enterprise in which the conservator has a significant beneficial interest.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-24.
Oath of conservator.

Before entering upon the duties of the appointment, every conservator appointed pursuant to the terms of this chapter shall take an oath or affirmation before the court to perform well and truly the duties required of a conservator and to account faithfully for the estate. The oath or affirmation of a conservator may be subscribed before the judge or clerk of any probate court of this state. The judge of the probate court who appoints the conservator shall have the authority to grant a commission to a judge or clerk of any court of record of any other state to administer the oath or affirmation.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.